Utah statutes.
61-2b-28.   Enforcement -- Investigation -- Orders -- Hearings.
(1) (a)  The division may investigate the actions of:
(i) a person registered, licensed, or certified under this chapter;
(ii)  an applicant for registration, licensure, or certification;
(iii)  an applicant for renewal of licensure or certification; or
(iv)  a person required to be registered, licensed, or certified under this
chapter.
(b)  The division may initiate an agency action against a person described in
Subsection (1)(a) in accordance with Title 63G, Chapter 4, Administrative
Procedures Act, to:
(i)  impose disciplinary action;
(ii)  deny issuance to an applicant of:
(A)  an original registration, license, or certification; or
(B)  a renewal of a license or certification; or
(iii)  issue a cease and desist order as provided in Subsection (3).
(2) (a)  The division may:
(i)  administer an oath or affirmation;
(ii)  subpoena a witness;
(iii)  take evidence; and
(iv)  require the production of a book, paper, contract, record, other
document, or information relevant to the investigation described in Subsection
(1).
(b)  The division may serve a subpoena by certified mail.
(c) A failure to respond to a request by the division in an investigation
authorized under this chapter is considered to be a separate violation of this
chapter, including:
(i)  failing to respond to a subpoena;
(ii)  withholding evidence; or
(iii)  failing to produce a document or record.
(3) (a)  The director shall issue and serve upon a person an order directing
that person to cease and desist from an act if:
(i)  the director has reason to believe that the person has been engaging, is
about to engage, or is engaging in the act constituting a violation of this
chapter; and
(ii)  it appears to the director that it would be in the public interest to
stop the act.
(b)  Within ten days after receiving the order, the person upon whom the order
is served may request a hearing.
(c)  Pending a hearing requested under Subsection (3)(b), a cease and desist
order shall remain in effect.
(d)  If a request for hearing is made, the division shall follow the
procedures and requirements of Title 63G, Chapter 4, Administrative Procedures
Act.
(4) (a)  After a hearing requested under Subsection (3), if the board agrees
that an act of the person violates this chapter, the board:
(i)  shall issue an order making the cease and desist order permanent; and
(ii)  may impose another disciplinary action under Section 61-2b-29.
(b)  The director shall commence an action in the name of the Department of
Commerce and Division of Real Estate, in the district court in the county in
which an act described in Subsection (3) occurs or where the person resides or
carries on business, to enjoin and restrain the person from violating this
chapter if:
(i) (A) a hearing is not requested under Subsection (3); and
(B)  the person fails to cease the act described in Subsection (3); or
(ii)  after discontinuing the act described in Subsection (3), the person
again commences the act.
(5) A remedy or action provided in this section does not limit, interfere
with, or prevent the prosecution of another remedy or action, including a
criminal proceeding.
